Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1409
Council; members; compensation; expenses.

The members of the council shall serve without compensation, but they shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual expenses incurred as a necessary incident to such service as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for state employees.

Laws 1969, c. 773, § 9, p. 2928;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 193.